Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1705
Seller, defined.

Seller shall mean a person who sells or leases or offers to sell or lease a seller-assisted marketing plan and:

(1) Has sold, leased, represents, or implies that the seller has sold or leased, whether in Nebraska or elsewhere, at least five seller-assisted marketing plans within twenty-four months prior to a solicitation; or

(2) Intends, represents, or implies that the seller intends to sell or lease, whether in Nebraska or elsewhere, at least five seller-assisted marketing plans within twelve months following a solicitation. If the seller intends to sell four or less seller-assisted marketing plans within the time period stated in this subdivision, the seller, in order to be excluded from the provisions of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act, shall notify each purchaser in writing at the time of sale of its intention to sell only four or less seller-assisted marketing plans.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 5;

Laws 1983, LB 461, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 5.